Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-259
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Intrastate Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act, the definitions found in sections 86-260 and 86-261 apply.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1102;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 121.